North Carolina, session 2025, HB1179.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-277.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1. Elderly or disabled property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Exclusion. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner is
designated a special class of property under Article V, Sec. 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The amount of the appraised value of
the residence equal to the exclusion amount is excluded from taxation. The exclusion amount is
the greater of twenty five thousand dollars ($25,000) or fifty percent (50%) of the appraised value
of the residence. An owner who receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other
property tax relief.Qualifying owners (i) with an income at or below fifty-five percent (55%) of
State median income shall receive the full exclusion amount of property tax relief provided under
*H1179-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this section, (ii) with an income between fifty-five percent (55%) and eighty percent (80%) of
State median income, the exclusion begins at one hundred percent (100%) of the exclusion
amount of property tax relief provided under this section, and is reduced by three and thirty-three
hundredths percent (3.33%) for every one percent (1%) of income above the fifty-five percent
(55%) threshold, and (iii) with an income at or above eighty percent (80%) of State median
income, no property tax relief is allowed under this section.
A qualifying owner is an owner who meets all of the following requirements as of January 1
preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed:
(1) Is at least 65 years of age or totally and permanently disabled.
(2) Has an income for the preceding calendar year of not more than the income
eligibility limit.State median income.
(3) Is a North Carolina resident.
…
(a2) Income Eligibility Limit. – For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2008, the income
eligibility limit is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). For taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2009, the income eligibility limit is the amount for the preceding year, adjusted by the
same percentage of this amount as the percentage of any cost-of-living adjustment made to the
benefits under Titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act for the preceding calendar year,
rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100.00). On or before July 1 of each year, the
Department of Revenue must determine the income eligibility amount to be in effect for the
taxable year beginning the following July 1 and must notify the assessor of each county of the
amount to be in effect for that taxable year.
(a3) Additional Relief. – An owner who receives an exclusion under this section may also
receive property tax relief under G.S. 105-277.1B provided that the owner meets the
requirements of that section.
…
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(3b) Resident senior. – A qualifying owner who (i) uses, as the owner's primary
residence, the permanent residence that qualifies for the property tax relief
provided by this section and (ii) can demonstrate primary, personal, and
sustained responsibility for the upkeep and continued maintenance of the
property.
(3c) State median income. – The most recent annual median household income for
the State as reported by the United States Census Bureau in the American
Community Survey 1-Year Estimates
…
(e1) Resident Senior Carveout. – Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
contrary, a permanent residence owned and occupied by a resident senior is entitled to the full
property tax relief provided by this section notwithstanding that the resident senior has a
proportional ownership interest in the property, provided that (i) no other non-spouse owner
permanently resides in the property with the resident senior and (ii) notice is provided to all other
co-owners of the property of the resident senior's election to defer under this subsection and no
co-owner objects thereto. If any co-owner objects to the resident senior receiving the full property
tax relief provided by this subsection, the proportional relief under subsection (e) of this section
shall apply to the primary residence."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 105-277.1B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1B. Property tax homestead circuit breaker.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section.
Page 2 House Bill 1179-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Definitions. – The definitions provided in G.S. 105-277.1 and the following
definitions apply to this section.section:
(1) Hold harmless amount. – The tax deferred under subsection (f) of this section.
(2) Resident senior. – A qualifying owner who (i) uses, as the owner's primary
residence, the permanent residence that qualifies for the property tax relief
provided by this section and (ii) can demonstrate primary, personal, and
sustained responsibility for the upkeep and continued maintenance of the
property.
(3) Total hold harmless amount. – The sum of the following:
a. The hold harmless amount for all permanent residences in the county.
b. The hold harmless amount for all permanent residences in cities
located within the county.
(c) Income Eligibility Limit. – The income eligibility limit provided in
G.S. 105-277.1(a2) applies to this section.For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2008, the
income eligibility limit is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). For taxable years beginning
on or after July 1, 2009, the income eligibility limit is the amount for the preceding year, adjusted
by the same percentage of this amount as the percentage of any cost-of-living adjustment made
to the benefits under Titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act for the preceding calendar year,
rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100.00). On or before July 1 of each year, the
Department of Revenue must determine the income eligibility amount to be in effect for the
taxable year beginning the following July 1 and must notify the assessor of each county of the
amount to be in effect for that taxable year.
(d) Qualifying Owner. – For the purpose of qualifying for the property tax homestead
circuit breaker under this section, a qualifying owner is an owner who meets all of the following
requirements as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed:
(1) The owner has an income for the preceding calendar year of not more than
one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the income eligibility limit specified in
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The owner has owned the property as a permanent residence for at least five
three consecutive years and has occupied the property as a permanent
residence for at least five three years.
(3) The owner is at least 65 years of age or totally and permanently disabled.
(4) The owner is a North Carolina resident.
(e) Multiple Owners. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by husband and wife
is entitled to the full benefit of the property tax homestead circuit breaker notwithstanding that
only one of them meets the length of occupancy and ownership requirements and the age or
disability requirement of this section. When Subject to subsection (e1) of this section, when a
permanent residence is owned and occupied by two or more persons other than husband and wife,
no the benefit of the property tax homestead circuit breaker is (i) allowed unless all of the owners
qualify and elect to defer taxes under this section.to each qualifying owner in the amount equal
to that owner's proportional ownership interest in the property and (ii) not allowed to any
nonqualifying owner. Each owner shall be responsible for the property taxes attributable to the
owner's respective proportional ownership interest. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to (i) affect the obligation of any owner to pay property taxes as required by Subchapter II of this
Chapter or (ii) impair any owner's rights under G.S. 46A-27 or G.S. 105-363.
(e1) Resident Senior Carveout. – Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the
contrary, a permanent residence owned and occupied by a resident senior is entitled to the full
property tax relief provided by this section notwithstanding that the resident senior has a
proportional ownership interest in the property, provided that (i) no other non-spouse owner
permanently resides in the property with the resident senior and (ii) notice is provided to all other
co-owners of the property of the resident senior's election to defer under this subsection and no
House Bill 1179-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
co-owner objects thereto. If any co-owner objects to the resident senior receiving the full property
tax relief provided by this subsection, the proportional relief under subsection (e) of this section
shall apply to the primary residence.
(f) Tax Limitation. – A qualifying owner may defer the portion of the principal amount
of tax that is imposed for the current tax year on his or her permanent residence and exceeds the
percentage of the qualifying owner's income set out in the table in this subsection. If a permanent
residence is subject to tax by more than one taxing unit and the total tax liability exceeds the tax
limit imposed by this section, then both the taxes due under this section and the taxes deferred
under this section must be apportioned among the taxing units based upon the ratio each taxing
unit's tax rate bears to the total tax rate of all units.
Income Over Income Up To Percentage
-0- Income Eligibility Limit 4.0%
Income Eligibility Limit 150% of Income Eligibility Limit 5.0%
(g) Temporary Absence. – An otherwise qualifying owner does not lose the benefit of
this circuit breaker because of a temporary absence from his or her permanent residence for
reasons of health, or because of an extended absence while confined to a rest home or nursing
home, so long as the residence is unoccupied or occupied by the owner's spouse or other
dependent.
(h) Deferred Taxes. – The difference between the taxes due under this section and the
taxes that would have been payable in the absence of this section are a lien on the real property
of the taxpayer as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The difference in taxes must be carried forward
in the records of each taxing unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes for the preceding three
fiscal years are due and payable in accordance with G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its
eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying event described in subsection (i) of this
section. On or before September 1 of each year, the collector must send to the mailing address of
a residence on which taxes have been deferred a notice stating the amount of deferred taxes and
interest that would be due and payable upon the occurrence of a disqualifying event.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the interest rate on liens under this
subsection shall be the lesser of (i) the rate established in G.S. 105-360 or (ii) the yield on 10-Year
U.S. Treasury Notes as of the date the lien attaches.
(i) Disqualifying Events. – Each of the following constitutes a disqualifying event:
(1) The owner transfers the residence. Transfer of the residence is not a
disqualifying event if (i) the owner transfers the residence to a co-owner of
the residence or, as part of a divorce proceeding, to his or her spouse and (ii)
that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.
(2) The owner dies. Death of the owner is not a disqualifying event if (i) the
owner's share passes to a co-owner of the residence or to his or her spouse and
(ii) that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.
(3) The owner ceases to use the property as a permanent residence.
(j) Gap in Deferral. – If an owner of a residence on which taxes have been deferred under
this section is not eligible for continued deferral for a tax year, the deferred taxes are carried
forward and are not due and payable until a disqualifying event occurs. If the owner of the
residence qualifies for deferral after one or more years in which he or she did not qualify for
deferral and a disqualifying event occurs, the years in which the owner did not qualify are
disregarded in determining the preceding three years for which the deferred taxes are due and
payable.
(k) Repealed by Session Laws 2008-35, s. 1.2, effective July 1, 2008.
(l) Creditor Limitations. – A mortgagee or trustee that elects to pay any tax deferred by
the owner of a residence subject to a mortgage or deed of trust does not acquire a right to foreclose
Page 4 House Bill 1179-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
as a result of the election. Except for requirements dictated by federal law or regulation, any
provision in a mortgage, deed of trust, or other agreement that prohibits the owner from deferring
taxes on property under this section is void.
(m) Construction. – This section does not affect the attachment of a lien for personal
property taxes against a tax-deferred residence.
(n) Application. – An application for property tax relief provided by this section should
be filed during the regular listing period, but may be filed and must be accepted at any time up
to and through June 1 preceding the tax year for which the relief is claimed. Persons may apply
for this property tax relief by entering the appropriate information on a form made available by
the assessor under G.S. 105-282.1.
(o) Reimbursement. – On or before September 1 of each year, each county tax collector
shall notify the Secretary of Revenue, in a manner prescribed by the Secretary, of the county's
total hold harmless amount. A county that fails to notify the Secretary of Revenue of its total hold
harmless amount by the due date is barred from receiving a reimbursement under this subsection
for that taxable year. On or before December 31 of each year, the Secretary of Revenue shall
distribute to each county its respective total hold harmless amount.
Any funds received by a county that are attributable to a city within the county must be
distributed to that respective city. Any funds received by a county or city because the county or
city was collecting taxes for another unit of government or special district must be credited to the
funds of that other unit or district in accordance with regulations issued by the Local Government
Commission.
In order to pay for the reimbursement under this section and the cost to the Department of
Revenue of administering the reimbursement, the Secretary of Revenue shall draw from
collections received under Part 2 of Article 4 of this Chapter an amount equal to the
reimbursement and the cost of administration."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Association of County Commissioners ("Association") the nonrecurring sum of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Association to provide
grants to local governments for the purpose of transitioning those governments to shortened
reappraisal cycles and thereby ensure more frequent and accurate property valuations. Grant
funds provided under this section shall be used by local governments for one-time capital
investments in technological infrastructure that improve local capacity and efficiency in
conducting reappraisals, including the acquisition of specialized software, data migration, and
the implementation of digital systems. In awarding grants under this section, the Association
shall prioritize awarding grants to local governments operating on a reappraisal cycle of more
than four years. For purposes of this section, "local governments" means counties, cities, or towns
conducting reappraisals of property under Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes
as of the effective date of this section.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Revenue ("Department") the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Department to study how to
efficiently and effectively implement a system of automatic income eligibility verification for
applicants for property tax relief under G.S. 105-277.1, 105-277.1B, and 105-277.1C.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice ("Department") the recurring sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) beginning with the
2026-2027 fiscal year to support eight full-time equivalent attorney positions at the Department
to assist local governments and the Department of Revenue with property tax appeals cases
arising under Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 5. Section 1 of this act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years
beginning on or after July 1, 2027. Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act become effective July 1, 2026.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 1179-First Edition Page 5